Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1424.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-714.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-714.02. Firearm safety and awareness instruction requirement; instructional materials A. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, each school district and charter school shall provide annual, age-appropriate firearm safety awareness instruction to students in kindergarten programs and each of grades one through twelve.  The instruction required by this section must: 1. Be limited to accident prevention and personal safety awareness. 2. Include at least the following: (a) Instruction on the importance of safe firearm storage in homes and motor vehicles. (b) Guidance on appropriate actions if a student encounters a firearm, including not touching the firearm, leaving the immediate area and immediately notifying a parent, teacher or other trusted adult. (c) Age-appropriate discussion of risks associated with unsafe handling or unauthorized access to firearms. 3. Not include any of the following: (a) A live firearm. (b) Ammunition or simulated ammunition. (c) A demonstration that involves handling, operating, loading, unloading or firing a firearm. (d) Instruction that is intended to train students in the use of firearms. (e) A moral judgment regarding lawful firearm possession. (f) aN INQUIRY, SURVEY OR REQUEST FOR INFORMATION ABOUT WHETHER A student, STUDENT'S PARENT OR MEMBER OF THE STUDENT'S HOUSEHOLD OWNS, POSSESSES OR MAY POSSESS A FIREARM OR ABOUT THE FIREARMs STORAGE PRACTICES OF A STUDENT, STUDENT'S PARENT OR member of the STUDENT'S HOUSEHOLD. 4. Be objective and not either promote or discourage firearm ownership or advocate for or against any political position, public policy or legislative proposal. B. A school district or charter school may provide the instruction required by this section through any of the following: 1. Classroom-based instruction. 2. An assembly presentation. 3. Video instruction or digital instructional materials that are approved by the department of education. 4. Instruction that is incorporated into the school district's or charter school's existing health or safety curricula. C. The Department of Education shall coordinate with the Department of Public Safety and the Arizona Game and Fish Department to develop firearm safety and awareness instructional materials and shall make the instructional materials available to school districts and charter schools in this state. The instructional materials developed pursuant to this subsection must be: 1. Developmentally appropriate for each grade band. 2. Fact-based and neutral in presentation. 3. Designed to promote injury prevention and student safety. D. Notwithstanding section 15-113, subsection B, each school district and charter school in this state shall make all learning materials that are used to satisfy the instruction requirements prescribed by this section available for parental review, including through electronic access when practicable. E. This section does not: 1. Regulate the possession, ownership, transfer or lawful use of firearms. 2. Authorize any person to collect student information related to firearms. 3. Conflict with any firearm preemption law in this state. END_STATUTE